Illinois, session 104th, HB3526.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. References to Act.This Act may be referred to 5as the Mobile Home Tenant Protection Act. 6    Section 5. The Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Rights Act 7is amended by changing Section 9 as follows: 8    (765 ILCS 745/9)  (from Ch. 80, par. 209)9    Sec. 9. The Terms of Fees and Rents. The terms for payment 10of rent shall be clearly set forth and all charges for 11services, ground or lot rent, unit rent, or any other charges 12shall be specifically itemized in the lease and in all 13billings of the tenant by the park owner.14    The owner shall not change the rental terms nor increase 15the cost of fees, except as provided herein.16    The park owner shall not charge a transfer or selling fee 17as a condition of sale of a mobile home that is going to remain 18within the park unless a service is rendered.19    Rents charged to a tenant by a park owner may be increased 20upon the renewal of a lease. Notification of an increase shall 21be delivered 90 days prior to expiration of the lease. A park 22owner may not increase rent more than 3% per year. The 3% cap   HB3526- 2 -LRB104 11121 JRC 21203 b1may be adjusted annually, beginning in 2027, to reflect a 2percentage equal to the percentage change in the consumer 3price index-u during the preceding 12-month calendar year that 4may not be more than a 5% increase in the 3% cap. As used in 5this Section "consumer price index-u" means the index 6published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United 7States Department of Labor that measures the average change in 8prices of goods and services purchased by all urban consumers, 9United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 10    The park owner shall not charge or impose upon a tenant any 11fee or increase in rent which reflects the cost to the park 12owner of any fine, forfeiture, penalty, money damages, or fee 13assessed or awarded by a court of law against the park owner, 14including any attorney's fees and costs incurred by the park 15owner in connection therewith unless the fine, forfeiture, 16penalty, money damages, or fee was incurred as a result of the 17tenant's actions.18    The park owner shall not charge or impose a pet fee upon a 19resident that owns the home, unless a service related to the 20pet is offered by the park owner and accepted by the resident. 21A tenant of a home owned by the park owner may be subject to 22the imposition of a pet fee as agreed to in the lease. 23(Source: P.A. 102-737, eff. 1-1-23.)